Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1485.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; department of administration; Tuba City Diné youth multipurpose complex project; exemption A. The sum of $6,000,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of administration to distribute to the Navajo Nation for the design, planning, construction, maintenance and operation costs of the Tuba City Diné youth multipurpose complex project. B. The appropriation made in subsection A of this section is exempt from the provisions of section 35-190, Arizona Revised Statutes, relating to lapsing of appropriations.